src/orthography/inituppercase.regex
а (->) А, ӓ (->) Ӓ, б (->) Б, в (->) В, г (->) Г, д (->) Д, е (->) Е,
ё (->) Ё, ж (->) Ж, з (->) З, и (->) И, й (->) Й, к (->) К, л (->) Л,
м (->) М, н (->) Н, о (->) О, ӧ (->) Ӧ, п (->) П, р (->) Р, с (->) С,
т (->) Т, у (->) У, ӱ (->) Ӱ, ф (->) Ф, х (->) Х, ц (->) Ц, ч (->) Ч,
ш (->) Ш, щ (->) Щ, ъ (->) Ъ, ы (->) Ы, ӹ (->) Ӹ, ы̆ (->) Ы̆, ь (->) Ь,
э (->) Э, ю (->) Ю, я (->) Я, ҥ (->) Ҥ || .#. _ ;
